Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3340
Social security numbers; recorded; when; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

(1) To aid child support enforcement pursuant to federal law, 42 U.S.C. 666(a), the social security numbers of the following individuals shall be recorded on the application, in the court records, or on the death certificate, as appropriate:

(a) Any applicant for a professional license, commercial driver's license, occupational license, or marriage license;

(b) Any individual who is subject to a divorce decree, support order, or paternity determination or acknowledgment; and

(c) Any individual who has died.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which provide a procedure for the collection of the social security numbers recorded pursuant to this section and for the use of such numbers in the child support enforcement as provided in 42 U.S.C. 666(a).

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 48.